Massachusetts, session 194th, H3182.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“First-time homebuyer,” a Massachusetts resident who has not owned a home at any
point in the last three years.
Section 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary there shall be a
refundable credit associated with first time homebuyers transferring capital investments into the
down payment on a primary residency. The amount of the credit shall be valued at the cost of
any capital gains tax owed or the value of the homebuyer’s down payment, whichever is lower.
Section 3. The liquidation of capital funds must occur within the 60 days prior to the
transfer of the property.
of 1